Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-420
Federal prisoners; expenses.

The Director of Correctional Services shall receive, safely keep, and subject to the discipline of the Department of Correctional Services, any criminal convicted of any crime against the United States, and sentenced to confinement therein by any court of the United States sitting within this state, until such sentence is executed or until such offender is discharged by due course of law. The United States shall support such offender and pay the expenses of executing his sentence.

Laws 1897, c. 75, § 26, p. 339;

R.S.1913, § 7330;

C.S.1922, § 6990;

C.S.1929, § 83-927;

R.S.1943, § 83-420;

Laws 1969, c. 817, § 78, p. 3110.